Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-816
Legislative Committee on Intergovernmental Cooperation; members.

The Legislative Committee on Intergovernmental Cooperation shall consist of five senators. The members and the chairman of this committee shall be designated in the same manner as is customary in the case of the members and chairman of other standing committees of the Legislature. In addition to the regular members, the President and the Speaker of the Legislature shall be ex officio honorary nonvoting members of this committee.

Laws 1937, c. 110, § 1, p. 406;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-7301;

R.S.1943, § 81-816.